Massachusetts, session 194th, H4259.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The tennis courts located in Weider Park managed by the department of
conservation and recreation located in the Roslindale section of the city of Boston at the corner
of Dale Street and Sherrin Street shall be formally known as the Kim O’Connell Tennis Courts
named after Kim O’Connell for her many years of dedicated service to her neighborhood.
SECTION 2. The Massachusetts Department of Conservation and Recreation shall erect
and maintain suitable markers bearing the designation in compliance with the standards of the
department.
of 1